de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Haarkosmetik > Zubehör für Haarstyling-Geräte: Lockenwicklerklammern & -nadeln; Haartrocknerzubehör; Haarverlängerungs-Werkzeuge & -Zubehör; Haareisenzubehör; Haarsprühflaschen; Haarstyling-Werkzeug-Etuis & -Taschen; Hitzematten & Ständer
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cuidado do cabelo > Acessórios para pentear o cabelo: Molas e clipes para enrolar o cabelo; Acessórios para secador de cabelo; Ferramentas e acessórios para extensões de cabelo; Acessórios para alisadores de cabelo; Frascos spray para cabelo; Estojos e bolsas para ferramentas de styling; Tapetes e suportes térmicos
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 모발 관리 > 헤어 스타일링 도구 부대용품: 헤어 컬링기 클립/핀; 헤어 드라이어 부대용품; 헤어 익스텐션 도구 및 액세서리; 고데기 부대용품; 헤어 스프레이 병; 헤어 스타일링 도구 케이스 및 파우치; 열 매트 및 스탠드
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cuidado capilar > Accesorios para útiles de peluquería: Pinzas y horquillas para rulos; Accesorios para secadores; Herramientas y accesorios de extensiones capilares; Accesorios para planchas de pelo; Botellas de aerosol capilar; Estuches y fundas de herramientas de peinado; Tapetes y soportes térmicos
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Hårpleje > Tilbehør til hårstylingredskaber: Clips og nåle til curlere; Tilbehør til hårtørrere; Hårforlængelsesredskaber og tilbehør; Tilbehør til hårjern; Hårsprayflasker; Hårstyling-redskabsetuier og tasker; Varmemåtter og stativer
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Hårpleie > Tilbehør til hårstylingsprodukter: Hårkrøllingsklips og -pinner; Tilbehør til hårtørkere; Hårextensionsverktøy og tilbehør; Tilbehør til rettetenger; Hårsprayflasker; Hårstylingverktøy etuier og poser; Varmematter og stativer
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cuidados com os cabelos > Acessórios para utensílios de penteado: Pregadores e rolos para cabelo; Acessórios para secadores de cabelo; Ferramentas e acessórios para extensão capilar; Acessórios para chapinhas; Borrifadores capilares; Estojos e pochetes para ferramentas de estilização; Tapetes e suportes térmicos
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Pielęgnacja włosów > Akcesoria do stylizacji włosów: Wałki do włosów i spinki do wałków; Akcesoria do suszarek do włosów; Narzędzia i akcesoria do przedłużania włosów; Akcesoria do prostownic do włosów; Butelki z rozpylaczem do włosów; Etui i saszetki na narzędzia do stylizacji włosów; Maty termoodporne i stojaki
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Hårvård > Tillbehör till hårstylingsprodukter: Pinnar och klämmor till hårrullar; Hårtorkstillbehör; Verktyg och tillbehör för hårförlängning; Plattångstillbehör; Hårsprayflaskor; Verktygsfodral och påsar för hårstyling; Värmemattor och stativ
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Soin des cheveux > Accessoires pour outils de coiffure: Bigoudis et pics à bigoudis; Accessoires pour sèche-cheveux; Outils et accessoires pour extensions capillaires; Accessoires pour fers à friser; Vaporisateurs capillaires; Étuis et pochettes pour appareils coiffants; Tapis et supports thermiques
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Грижа за косата > Аксесоари за инструменти за оформяне на коса: Щипки и фиби за маши за коса; Аксесоари за сешоар; Инструменти и аксесоари за удължаване на коса; Аксесоари за преса за коса; Пулверизатори за коса; Калъфи и торбички за инструменти за коса; Термоподложки и стойки
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Hajápolás > Hajformázóeszköz-kiegészítők: Hajcsavaró klipek és tűk; Hajszárító-kiegészítők; Hajhosszabbító eszközök és kiegészítők; Hajvasaló-kiegészítők; Hajpermetező palackok; Hajformázó tokok; Hőálló alátétek
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > ヘアケア用品 > ヘアスタイリング道具関連用品: ヘアカーラー用クリップ・ピン; ヘアドライヤー関連用品; エクステンション用品・アクセサリー; ヘアアイロン関連用品; ヘアスプレーボトル; ヘアスタイリング器具ケース・ポーチ; 耐熱マット・スタンド
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Nega las > Dodatki za orodje za oblikovanje las: Sponke in zatiči za kodralnike las; Dodatki za sušilnik las; Pripomočki in dodatki za podaljševanje las; Dodatki za likalnik za lase; Razpršilke za lase; Etuiji in torbice za orodje za oblikovanje las; Toplotne podloge in stojala
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Hair Care > Hair Styling Tool Accessories: Hair Curler Clips & Pins; Hair Dryer Accessories; Hair Extension Tools & Accessories; Hair Iron Accessories; Hair Spray Bottles; Hair Styling Tool Cases & Pouches; Heat Mats & Stands
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Cura dei capelli > Accessori per utensili per parrucchieri: Fermagli e spilloni per bigodini; Accessori asciugacapelli; Strumenti e accessori per extension di capelli; Accessori arricciacapelli; Flaconi spray per capelli; Custodie e borsette per strumenti di styling dei capelli; Tappetini e supporti termici
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Saç Bakımı > Saç Şekillendirme Aleti Aksesuarları: Bigudi Kıskaç ve İğneleri; Saç Kurutma Makinesi Aksesuarları; Saç Kaynak Araçları ve Aksesuarları; Saç Düzleştirici Aksesuarları; Saç Sprey Şişeleri; Saç Şekillendirme Aleti Çantaları ve Kılıfları; Isı Paspasları ve Stantları
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Plaukų priežiūra > Plaukų formavimo įrankių priedai: Plaukų suktukų segtukai ir smeigtukai; Plaukų džiovintuvų priedai; Plaukų tąsų įrankiai ir priedai; Plaukų formavimo žnyplių priedai; Plaukų purškalų buteliukai; Plaukų formavimo įrankių dėklai ir maišeliai; Karščio kilimėliai ir stovai
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc tóc > Phụ kiện dụng cụ làm tóc: Kẹp ghim uốn tóc; Phụ kiện máy sấy tóc; Dụng cụ và phụ kiện nối tóc; Phụ kiện máy duỗi tóc; Bình xịt tóc; Hộp và túi đựng dụng cụ tạo kiểu tóc; Thảm và giá chống nóng
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Îngrijirea părului > Accesorii pentru instrumente de coafat: Agrafe și cleme pentru bigudiuri; Accesorii uscător de păr; Instrumente și accesorii pentru extensii de păr; Accesorii pentru placă de păr; Sticle cu pulverizator pentru păr; Huse și genți pentru instrumente de coafat; Covorașe și suporturi termorezistente
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Njega kose > Dodaci za oblikovanje kose: Kopče i ukosnice za uvijanje kose; Pribor za sušilo za kosu; Alati i dodaci za ekstenzije kose; Pribor za peglu za kosu; Raspršivači za kosu; Futrole i torbice za alate za stiliziranje kose; Termootporne podloge i stalci
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การดูแลผม > อุปกรณ์จัดแต่งผม: คลิปและปิ่นของโรลม้วนผม; อุปกรณ์ไดร์เป่าผม; เครื่องมือและอุปกรณ์ต่อผม; อุปกรณ์ที่หนีบผม; ขวดสเปรย์ใส่น้ำสำหรับผม; กระเป๋าและซองใส่อุปกรณ์จัดแต่งผม; แผ่นรองความร้อนและที่วางเครื่องมือ
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Starostlivosť o vlasy > Príslušenstvo k nástrojom na úpravu vlasov: Klipy a sponky na kulmovanie vlasov; Príslušenstvo k sušičom vlasov; Nástroje a príslušenstvo pre predlžovanie vlasov; Príslušenstvo k žehličke na vlasy; Rozprašovače na vlasy; Puzdrá a vrecká na vlasové nástroje; Tepelné podložky a stojany
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 頭髮保養 > 髮型工具配件: 捲髮器固定夾/針; 吹風機配件; 髮延工具及配件; 直/捲整髮器; 髮膠噴瓶; 髮型工具盒及袋; 熱墊及架
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 头发护理 > 头发造型工具配件: 鸭嘴夹/卷发用抓夹发夹; 电吹风配件; 接发工具/配件; 烫发器配件; 喷发瓶; 美发工具盒/工具袋; 隔热垫和支架
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Péče o vlasy > Nástroje pro vlasový styling – příslušenství: Svorky a spony na natáčky; Fény – příslušenství; Nástroje a příslušenství k prodlužování vlasů; Žehličky na vlasy – příslušenství; Rozprašovače na vlasy; Pouzdra na stylingové nástroje na vlasy; Tepelné podložky a stojany
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Уход за волосами > Аксессуары для инструментов для укладки волос: Зажимы и шпильки для бигудей; Аксессуары для фенов для волос; Инструменты и аксессуары для наращивания волос; Аксессуары для выпрямителей для волос; Распылители для волос; Чехлы и сумки для инструментов укладки волос; Термоковрики и подставки
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Haarverzorging > Accessoires voor haarstylingsapparaten: Klemmen en pennen voor krultangen; Accessoires voor haardrogers; Hairextension gereedschap en accessoires; Accessoires voor haartangen; Haar spray flessen; Haar styling gereedschap hoezen en tasjes; Hitte matten en standaards
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Περιποίηση μαλλιών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων styling μαλλιών: Κλιπ & τσιμπιδάκια για συσκευές κατσαρώματος των μαλλιών; Αξεσουάρ σεσουάρ μαλλιών; Εργαλεία και αξεσουάρ επεκτάσεων μαλλιών; Αξεσουάρ για σίδερα μαλλιών; Μπουκάλια σπρέι μαλλιών; Θήκες εργαλείων styling; Θερμικά χαλάκια και βάσεις
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Hiustenhoito > Hiusten muotoiluvälineiden lisätarvikkeet: Kampausklipsit ja -pinnit; Hiustenkuivaimen lisätarvikkeet; Hiustenpidennyslaitteen tarvike; Suoristusraudan lisätarvikkeet; Hiusten suihkepullo; Hiustyökalukotelo ja -pussi; Lämpömatto ja -teline